Utah statutes.
31A-22-1410.   Report to policyholder.

A monthly report shall be provided to the policyholder any time a long-term care benefit funded through a life insurance vehicle by the acceleration of the death benefit is in benefit payment status.  The report shall include:

(1)  any long-term care benefits paid out during the month;

(2)  an explanation of any changes in the policy due to long-term care benefits being paid out such as death benefits or cash values; and

(3)  the amount of long-term care benefits existing or remaining.

